Maryland, session 2025, HB0222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
19–108.
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, TRANSFER, OR DISTRIBUTE
NON–ARC–RESISTANT JACKETED CORRUGATED STAINLESS STEEL TUBING THAT:
(1) DOES NOT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE LC1027 STANDARD
DESCRIBED IN THE MOST RECENT EDITION OF THE INTERNATIONAL FUEL AND GAS
CODE ISSUED BY THE INTERNATIONAL CODE COUNCIL; OR
– 1 –

Ch. 385 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) HAS NOT BEEN PROVEN TO WITHSTAND AT LEAST 36 COULOMBS
OF ELECTRICAL ARCING CHARGE BY AN ELECTRICAL ARCING TEST.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $1,000.
Article – Public Safety
12–206.
(a) This section applies to any building that uses fuel gas piping systems not
subject to Title 49, Part 192 of the Code of Federal Regulations.
(b) [Non–arc–resistant jacketed] ONLY corrugated stainless steel tubing THAT
MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE LC1027 STANDARD DESCRIBED IN THE MOST
RECENT EDITION OF THE INTERNATIONAL FUEL AND GAS CODE ISSUED BY THE
INTERNATIONAL CODE COUNCIL OR HAS BEEN PROVEN TO WITHSTAND AT LEAST
36 COULOMBS OF ELECTRICAL ARCING CHARGE BY AN ELECTRICAL ARCING TEST
may [not] be used in:
(1) the new construction of a customer–owned natural gas or liquefied
propane piping system in a building;
(2) a natural gas or liquefied propane piping system in a renovated
property if the renovation affects more than 50% of the total square footage of the property;
or
(3) a natural gas or liquefied propane piping system that requires the
addition of a new gas line to the gas piping system.
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $1,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Labor and the Office of the State Fire Marshal
shall conduct a study and make recommendations related to preventing the fire hazards
associated with commonly used fuel gas piping systems, including gas piping and
corrugated stainless steel tubing, in residential and commercial buildings.
(b) In conducting the study and making the recommendations, the Department
and the Office shall:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 385
(1) study and compare the fire hazard risks of different types of fuel gas
piping systems, including gas piping and corrugated stainless steel tubing;
(2) study the likelihood of fuel gas piping systems, including gas piping and
corrugated stainless steel tubing, causing a fire in a residential or commercial building
following a direct or indirect lightning strike;
(3) analyze the effectiveness of existing standards and requirements in the
State related to fuel gas piping systems, including gas piping and corrugated stainless steel
tubing, and identify areas for improvement;
(4) analyze and identify the best practices for state and local legislative,
regulatory, and building code standards for fuel gas piping systems, including gas piping
and corrugated stainless steel tubing;
(5) identify potential legislative or regulatory changes in the State to
prevent or minimize the fire hazards associated with fuel gas piping systems, including gas
piping and corrugated stainless steel tubing, § 12–206 of the Public Safety Article, and if
enacted by S.B. 175 or H.B. 222 of 2025, § 19–108 of the Business Regulation Article;
(6) determine what industry standards or requirements are necessary to
prevent or minimize the fire hazards associated with fuel gas piping systems, including gas
piping and corrugated stainless steel tubing;
(7) determine what standards or requirements are necessary, if any, to
address aggravating factors that may reasonably contribute to the failure or
malfunctioning of fuel gas piping systems, including gas piping and corrugated stainless
steel tubing, and create a fire hazard, such as improper installation or grounding;
(8) assess the prevalence of non–arc–resistant jacketed corrugated
stainless steel tubing in residential and commercial buildings and the fire hazards that this
presents; and
(9) assess the feasibility of implementing the standards and requirements
identified in this study.
(c) In carrying out the study, the Department and the Office shall consult with:
(1) the State Fire Prevention Commission;
(2) the Maryland Department of Labor;
(3) local government entities responsible for residential or commercial gas
fitting inspections; and
– 3 –

Ch. 385 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) (3) manufacturers of fuel gas piping systems and corrugated stainless steel
tubing.
(d) (1) On or before December 1, 2025, the Department and the Office shall
submit an interim report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Committee on
Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House Environment and Transportation
Committee.
(2) On or before September 1, 2026, the Department and the Office shall
report its findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the
Environment and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2027 June 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 4 –